ro-RO: Tehnologia codului: Digital; Comutator DIP; Cod fix; Intellicode; Cod rulant; Security+; Security+ 2.0; Altele
zh-CN: 编码技术: 数字化; 拨码开关; 固定码; 智能码; 滚动码; 增强安全; 增强安全 2.0; 其他
ru: Технология кодирования: Цифровая; DIP-переключатель; Исправленный код; Интеллектуальный код; Плавающий код; Security+; Security+ 2.0; Другая
es: Tecnología de código: Digital; Interruptor DIP; Código fijo; Intellicode; Código rodante; Security+; Seguridad+ 2.0; Otros
nb: Kodeteknologi: Digital; DIP-bryter; Fast kode; Intellicode; Rullende kode; Sikkerhet+; Sikkerhet+ 2.0; Annet
bg-BG: Технология на кода: Цифрово; DIP превключвател; Фиксиран код; Intellicode; Подвижен код; Сигурност+; Сигурност+ 2.0; Друго
ja: コード技術: デジタル; ディップスイッチ; 修正済みコード; インテリコード; ローリングコード; セキュリティ+; セキュリティ+ 2.0; その他
vi: Công nghệ mã: Kỹ thuật số; Công tắc gạt; Mã cố định; Intellicode; Mã nhảy; An toàn+; Security+ 2.0; Khác
it: Tecnologia del codice: Digitale; Interruttore DIP; Codice fisso; Intellicode; Codice a rotazione; Security+; Security+ 2.0; Altro
en: Code technology: Digital; Dip switch; Fixed code; Intellicode; Rolling code; Security+; Security+ 2.0; Other
pl: Technologia kodowania: Cyfrowa; Przełącznik DIP; Kod stały; Intellicode; Kod zmienny; Security+; Security+ 2.0; Pozostałe
hr-HR: Tehnologija koda: Digitalni; DIP prekidač; Fiksni kod; Intellicode; Promjenjiv kod; Zaštita+; Security+ 2.0; Ostalo
hu: Kódtechnológia: Digitális; DIP-kapcsoló; Fix kód; Intellicode; Léptetőkód; Security+; Security+ 2.0; Egyéb
el: Τεχνολογία κωδικοποίησης: Ψηφιακός; Διακόπτης DIP; Σταθερός κωδικός; Intellicode; Κυλιόμενος κωδικός; Security+; Security+ 2.0; Άλλο
nl: Codetechnologie: Digitaal; Dipswitch; Vaste code; Intellicode; Rolling code; Beveiliging+; Security+ 2.0; Overig
sv: Kodteknik: Digital; DIP-brytare; Fast kod; Intellicode; Rullande kod; Security+; Security+ 2.0; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tecnologia de código: Digital; Interruptor DIP; Código fixo; Intellicode; Código rotativo; Security+; Segurança+ 2.0; Outro
fi: Kooditeknologia: Digitaalinen; DIP-kytkin; Kiinteä koodi; Intellicode; Vaihtuva koodi; Security+; Turvallisuus+ 2.0; Muu
sk-SK: Technológia kódu: Digitálny; DIP prepínač; Pevný kód; Intellicode; Dynamický kód; Bezpečnosť+; Security+ 2.0; Iné
sl-SI: Tehnologija kodiranja: Digitalno; DIP stikalo; Fiksna koda; Intellicode; Valjasta koda; Varnost+; Varnost+ 2.0; Druga
fr: Technologie de codage: Numérique; Interrupteur DIP; Code fixe; Intellicode; Code tournant; Sécurité+; Security+ 2.0; Autre
th: เทคโนโลยีรหัส: ดิจิทัล; สวิตช์ DIP; โค้ดคงที่; อินเทลลิโค้ด; โค้ดหมุนเวียน; Security+; Security+ 2.0; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Kodo technologija: Skaitmeninis; DIP jungiklis; Fiksuotas kodas; „Intellicode“ sistema; „Rolling code“ sistema; Security+; „Security+ 2.0“ sistema; Kita
zh-TW: 編碼技術: 數位; 指撥開關; 修復程式碼; Intellicode; 滾動碼; Security+; Security+ 2.0; 其他
cs: Kódovací technologie: Digitální; DIP přepínač; Pevný kód; Intellicode; Plovoucí kód; Security+; Security+ 2.0; Jiné
tr: Kod teknolojisi: Dijital; Dip anahtarı; Sabit kod; Intellicode; Değişken kod; Security+; Security+ 2.0; Diğer
ko: 코드 기술: 디지털; 딥 스위치; 수정된 코드; 인텔리코드; 롤링 코드; 시큐리티+; Security+ 2.0; 기타
pt-BR: Tecnologia de código: Digital; Interruptor DIP; Código fixo; Intellicode; Código rolante; Security+; Security+ 2.0; Outro
de: Codetechnologie: Digital; DIP-Schalter; Korrigierter Code; Intellicode; Rollingcode; Sicherheit+; Security+ 2.0; Sonstiges
da: Kodeteknologi: Digital; Dip-switch; Fast kode; Intellicode; Rullende kode; Security+; Security+ 2.0; Andet